resultats/hunspell/catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: reeixir
SFX 82 Y 98
SFX 82 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 82 r nt/_C ir
SFX 82 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 82 r da/_Y ir
SFX 82 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 82 r des/_Y ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxo/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsc/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxes/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïx/_Z ir
SFX 82 r m/_Z ir
SFX 82 r u/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxen/_Z ir
SFX 82 r a/_Z ir
SFX 82 r es/_Z ir
SFX 82 r a/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r en/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquí/_Z ir
SFX 82 r res/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqueres/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqué/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquérem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquéreu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqueren/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 82 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 82 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 82 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqui/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxi/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsques/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquis/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxis/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqui/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxi/_Z ir
SFX 82 r m/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquem/_Z ir
SFX 82 r u/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqueu/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquen/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquin/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxin/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqués/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquera/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquessis/_Z ir
SFX 82 r res/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqueres/_Z ir
SFX 82 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquesses/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqués/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquera/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquéssim/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquérem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquéssem/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquéreu/_Z ir
SFX 82 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquésseu/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquessin/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsqueren/_Z ir
SFX 82 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquessen/_Z ir
SFX 82 eixir ïx/_C ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsca/_D ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxi/_D ir
SFX 82 r m/_C ir
SFX 82 r u/_C ir
SFX 82 eixir ïsquen/_C ir
SFX 82 eixir ïxin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: renyir
SFX 83 Y 101
SFX 83 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 83 r nt/_C ir
SFX 83 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 83 r da/_Y ir
SFX 83 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 83 r des/_Y ir
SFX 83 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 83 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir iny/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 83 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir inys/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 83 r x/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir iny/_Z ir
SFX 83 r m/_Z ir
SFX 83 r u/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 83 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir inyen/_Z ir
SFX 83 r a/_Z ir
SFX 83 r es/_Z ir
SFX 83 r a/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 83 r en/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 83 r res/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 83 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 83 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 83 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 83 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 83 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir inya/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 83 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir inyes/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 83 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir inya/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 83 r m/_Z ir
SFX 83 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 83 r u/_Z ir
SFX 83 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 83 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 83 enyir inyen/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 83 r res/_Z ir
SFX 83 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 83 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 83 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 83 r x/_C ir
SFX 83 enyir iny/_C ir
SFX 83 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 83 r sca/_D ir
SFX 83 enyir inya/_D ir
SFX 83 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 83 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 83 r m/_C ir
SFX 83 r guem/_C ir
SFX 83 r u/_C ir
SFX 83 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 83 r squen/_C ir
SFX 83 enyir inyen/_C ir
SFX 83 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 83 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: revendre
SFX 84 Y 69
SFX 84 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 84 dre ent/_C re
SFX 84 dre ut/_v_Y re
SFX 84 dre uda/_Y re
SFX 84 dre uts/_Y re
SFX 84 dre udes/_Y re
SFX 84 dre c/_Z re
SFX 84 dre s/_Z re
SFX 84 endre èn/_Z re
SFX 84 dre em/_Z re
SFX 84 dre eu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre en/_Z re
SFX 84 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 84 dre ies/_Z re
SFX 84 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 84 dre íem/_Z re
SFX 84 dre íeu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre ien/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guí/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gueres/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gué/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guérem/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guéreu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 84 e é/_Z re
SFX 84 e às/_Z re
SFX 84 e à/_Z re
SFX 84 e em/_Z re
SFX 84 e eu/_Z re
SFX 84 e an/_Z re
SFX 84 e ia/_Z re
SFX 84 e ies/_Z re
SFX 84 e ia/_Z re
SFX 84 e íem/_Z re
SFX 84 e íeu/_Z re
SFX 84 e ien/_Z re
SFX 84 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gues/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guis/_Z re
SFX 84 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guem/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gueu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guen/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guin/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guessis/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gueres/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guesses/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guéssim/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guérem/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guéssem/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guéreu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guésseu/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guessin/_Z re
SFX 84 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 84 dre guessen/_Z re
SFX 84 endre èn/_C re
SFX 84 dre ga/_D re
SFX 84 dre gui/_D re
SFX 84 dre guem/_C re
SFX 84 dre eu/_C re
SFX 84 dre guen/_C re
SFX 84 dre guin/_C re
